Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1001.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303(a.7) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 303. Classes of Income.--* * *(a.7) The following apply:* * *(8) An amount received from the Federal or State Government or Jet Rescue Air Ambulance, or an agent thereof, as a result of the Med Jets Flight 056 plane crash that occurred in 12345678910111213141516171819202122 Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, on January 31, 2025, shall not be considered income subject to the tax imposed by this article.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1001PN1088 - 2 - 1234